Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-709
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development, in consultation with the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act. The department shall monitor programs to see that only qualified individuals and families are occupying projects funded by the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 7.
July 18, 2026